Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Veterans’ Affairs

40.300.
Department of Veterans’ Affairs attached to Office of Governor — Organization.

There is created the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, which shall be attached to the Office of the Governor for administrative purposes. Notwithstanding KRS

12.028

, the department’s status as a separate organizational unit attached to the Office of the Governor shall not be changed except by action of the General Assembly. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS

12.040

. The Office of the Commissioner is created within the department.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall include the Governor’s Advisory Board for Veterans’ Affairs established by KRS

40.305

.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall be responsible for providing services to veterans in accordance with KRS

40.310

and KRS

40.320

to

40.335

.

There is created the Office of Veteran Legal Services within the Office of the Commissioner. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

who shall report to the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

There is created the Office of Kentucky Veterans’ Services within the Office of the Commissioner. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

who shall report to the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 10, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2021 ch. 95, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

40.305.
Governor’s Advisory Board for Veterans’ Affairs — Membership — Meetings — Duties of board and commissioner of Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

There is created a board to be known as the Governor’s Advisory Board for Veterans’ Affairs, which shall be attached to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The board shall be composed of the following:

Seven (7) members appointed by the Governor, two (2) of whom shall be recommended by the Joint Executive Council of Veterans Organizations of Kentucky;

The executive director of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs; and

The adjutant general of the Commonwealth.

All board members appointed by the Governor shall serve until their successors are appointed, and all appointments shall be for three (3) years. It is further provided that the appointments shall be veterans with service during time of war or hostilities wherein American troops were engaged in conflict with an armed enemy. If practicable, the Governor, in making appointments to the board, shall give due consideration to a fair representation on the board of nationally recognized veterans’ organizations active in Kentucky, based on size of the membership of such organizations in this state. The state headquarters of each major veterans’ organization may, from time to time, submit a list of not more than three (3) names to the Governor from which list original appointments may be made and vacancies filled in his discretion.

Members of the board shall meet at least quarterly at the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, and at such other times as the chairman may designate, and the members shall decide as to the specific meeting date.

Members of the board shall be paid for the actual expenses incurred upon attendance of meetings of the board subject to the Finance and Administration Cabinet regulations.

At its first meeting the members of the board shall select a chairman, vice chairman, and secretary from among the appointed members.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide administrative support to the board.

The board shall advise the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs and the Governor on the administration of veterans’ services programs.

The commissioner shall advise the Governor on matters relating to veterans’ affairs.

The commissioner and the board shall advise the General Assembly on matters relating to veterans’ affairs and the administration of veterans’ services programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 222, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); ch. 74, Art. VI, § 33; 1980, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 118, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 244, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 280, §§ 1, 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 10, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 23, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

Compiler’s Notes

This section is set out above to reflect a correction made to the 7/14/2000 Legislative Research Commission Note.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). In accordance with
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 280, sec. 3, the amendment of the former KRS

36.310

in Section 1 of Acts Chapter 280 has been merged into the repeal and reenactment of that statute as
KRS

40.305

by 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 147, sec. 2, notwithstanding
KRS

446.260

.

40.310.
Duties of Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall collect all necessary data and information regarding facilities and services available to veterans, their families, and dependents, and shall cooperate with all information or service agencies throughout the state in informing such persons regarding the existence or availability of all educational, training, and retraining facilities; health, medical, rehabilitation, and housing services and facilities; employment and reemployment services; provisions of federal, state, and local laws affording rights, privileges, and benefits to said persons, their families, and dependents, and all other matters of similar related or appropriate nature. It shall likewise be the duty of the department to assist veterans and their families and dependents in the presentation, proof, and establishment of all claims, privileges, rights, and other benefits which they may have under federal, state, or local laws, and to cooperate with all national, state, and local government and private agencies securing services or any benefits to veterans, their families, and dependents.

The commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall prepare and submit to the Governor and each member of the board an annual report with reference to claims presented on behalf of veterans and to otherwise report the activities and accomplishments of the department.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall be authorized to apply for and accept gifts, grants, and other contributions from the federal government, or from any other governmental unit which funds shall be administered by the department through use of trust and agency accounts.

Veterans, as used in KRS

40.305

to

40.310

include any individual who served on active duty during peace or war in the Armed Forces of the United States, and who has received an honorable discharge from such service.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall maintain full, adequate, and complete copies of all records pertaining to claims of veterans who file said claims for benefits through the department.

The commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs may purchase liability insurance for the protection of employees of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs to protect them from liability for acts, omissions, and claims arising in the course and scope of their employment or service to the department.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall manage the veterans’ program trust fund established by KRS

40.460

by hosting all board meetings, providing logistical support, recording the minutes of each meeting, and authorizing expenditures once the board has approved a request for funds.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 114, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

40.315.
State veterans’ cemeteries — Administrative regulations — Funding.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall establish and maintain state veterans’ cemeteries in the Commonwealth for the purpose of providing for the interment of Kentucky veterans of the United States Armed Forces and for their next of kin, as determined by the department.

The Kentucky state veterans’ cemeteries shall be under the administrative authority and control of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to operate the cemeteries in compliance with applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs is authorized to seek federal and private funding for the construction, renovation, and operation of Kentucky state veterans’ cemeteries.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 147, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

40.317.
Veterans’ benefits regional administrators and field representatives — Duties.

The Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall employ no more than five (5) veterans’ benefits regional administrators and no fewer than twenty (20) veterans’ benefits field representatives.

The duties of a veterans’ benefits regional administrator shall include but not be limited to supervision of veterans’ benefits field representatives in an assigned region.

The duties of a veterans’ benefits field representative shall include but not be limited to providing assistance to veterans and their dependents with initiation, preparation, documentation, and adjudication of claims to benefits under federal, state, or local laws.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, § 13, effective April 25, 2006; 2020 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.